dictsource/la_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Reference:
// Allen, W. Sidney. Vox Latina — a Guide to the Pronunciation of Classical Latin.
// Cambridge University Press, Second edition, 2003. ISBN 0-521-37936-9.

// Orthographic notes:
//
// In classical latin the letters A B C D E F G H I K L M N O P Q R S T V X Y Z were
// used. I and V were used for both the vowels /i/ and /u/, and the semivowels /j/ and
// /w/. Here the distinction between U and the V for /u/ and /w/ is assumed, as is the
// case in most modern texts. Also long vowels are indicated with macrons. Diaresis is
// used to prevent a diphthong being formed. Y with macron has to be replaced by 'yy', 
// since this character is incompatible with older unicode versions.


// OPTIONS (accents)
// This version of espeak takes into acceount 2 varients of latin:
//      ?1  Classical Pronunciation
//      ?2  Ecclesiastical (Modern Italianate) Pronunciation

.replace
â	ā
ê	ē
î	ī
ô	ō
û	ū
ŷ	yy


.L01 ae au eu oe ui a e i o u yy y ā ē ī ō ū ë ü é æ
.L02 ng qu pr tr cr chr br dr gr pl cl bl gl ph th ch 
// prefixs
.L03 ab ad ante circum con contra dē ex in inter ob per post prae pro re se sub super trans

.group a
             a            a
    // Weak penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenutimate
             a (L01X      =a
             a (CL01X     =a
             a (L02L01X   =a
             a (guL01X    =a
             a (x+        a
    // Diphthongs
             ae (+++      aE
             au (+++      aU


.group ā
             ā            a:


.group æ
             æ            aE

.group b
             b            b
             bb           b:


.group c
             c            k
             cc           k:
             cch          k:<h> // e.g. bracchium
             ch           k<h>


.group d
             d            d
             dd           d:


.group e
             e            E
    // Weak penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenutimate
             e (L01X      =E
             e (CL01X     =E
             e (L02L01X   =E
             e (guL01X    =E
             e (x+        E
    // Diphthongs
             eu (+++      EU


.group ē
             ē            e:



.group f
             f            f
             ff           f:


.group g
             g            g
             gg           g:
             g (n         N
    // classical latin drops the g sound at the beginning of the word if followed by n
          _) g (n
             ggu (A       g:w // Does this ever occur?
             gu (A        gw //g<w>


.group h
             h            h
             h:           h:


.group i
             i            I
    // Weak penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenutimate
             i (L01X      =I
             i (CL01X     =I
             i (L02L01X   =I
             i (guL01X    =I
             i (x+        I
    // Two adjacent 'i's should be separated by a glottal stop
             i (iX        =I?
             i (i         I?
    // Cases in which 'i' is pronounced as the semi-vowel /j/
          _) i (A         j
          A) i (A+        j:
    // Exceptions: compound formations
        L03) i (A+        j
    // Exceptions where u is a consonant
         qu) i (L01X++    =I
         qu) i (A++        I
         gu) i (L01X++    =I
         gu) i (A++        I
         _u) i (L01X++    =I
         _u) i (A++        I
         Au) i (L01X++    =I
         Au) i (A++        I
    // Exceptions to the exceptions
         au) i (A+++       j:
         eu) i (A+++       j:


.group ī
             ī            i:

.group j
             j            j
             jj           j:
    // Intervocalic gemination between vowels, e.g., dejectus -> dej-jectus
          A) j (A+        j:
    // Exceptions: compound formations
        L03) j (A+        j


.group k
             k            k
             kk           k:


.group l
             l            l/2
             ll           l:
             l (i         l
             l (y         l
             l (ȳ         l
             l (yy        l


.group m
             m            m
             mm           m:


.group n
             n            n
             nn           n:
             n (g         N
             n (c         N
             n (k         N
             n (x         N
             n (q         N


.group o
             o            O
    // Weak penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenutimate
             o (L01X      =O
             o (CL01X     =O
             o (L02L01X   =O
             o (guL01X    =O
             o (x+        O
    // Diphthongs
             oe (+++      OE


.group ō
             ō            o:


.group p
             p            p
             pp           p:
             pph          p:<h>
             ph           p<h>


.group qu
             qu           kw //k<w>


.group r
          C) r            @-*
             r            R
          _) r            R
             rr           R*
          A) r (A         R


.group s
             s            s
             ss           s:


.group t
             t            t
             tt           t:
             tth          t:<h> //Does this occur? It does at least across word boundaries e.g. leget Thyni
             th           t<h>


.group u
             u            U
    // Weak penultimate syllable: put stress on antepenutimate
             u (L01X      =U
             u (CL01X     =U
             u (L02L01X   =U
             u (guL01X    =U
             u (x+        U
    // Cases in which 'u' is pronounced as the semi-vowel /w/
          A) u (A++       w
          _) u (A+        w
    // rare diphthong
    // // Diphthongs
    //          ui (+++      uI


.group ū
             ū            u:



.group v
             v            w
          _) v            w
             vv (+++      w:


.group x
             x            ks


.group y
             y            y  // Kirshenbaum I.
             yy           y: // Should be y with macron, which is not present in older Unicode versions

.group ȳ
             ȳ            y:


.group z
             z            z
             zz           z:
          A) z (A         z:


.group
             w            w
